Hawaii statutes.
§328-17.7 Record of prescriptions. (a) Every practitioner, pharmacist, or medical oxygen
distributor who compounds, sells, or delivers any prescribed drug to a patient
or a patient's agent shall maintain records that identify:

(1) The specific drug product dispensed, including:

(A) The product's national drug code (NDC)
number; or

(B) The brand name or the established name
and the name or commonly accepted abbreviation of the principal labeler of the
drug product dispensed, the product strength, and the dosage form;

(2) The quantity of the
drug;

(3) Directions for use;

(4) The number of allowable
refills;

(5) The date of initial
dispensing and the dates of all refilling;

(6) The date of any
transfer of the prescription;

(7) The name, business address,
and telephone number of the recipient pharmacist or medical oxygen distributor
for any transfer of prescription;

(8) The prescribing
practitioner, including name, business address, and telephone number;

(9) The format (oral,
written, or electronic) in which the prescription was received;

(10) Except as otherwise
authorized for expedited partner therapy in section 453-52, the patient,
including name, address, and telephone number;

(11) The date of
prescribing; and

(12) The name of the
practitioner, pharmacist, or medical oxygen distributor dispensing the drug.

Every prescription dispensed shall have the name of
the pharmacist, dispensing practitioner, or medical oxygen distributor
responsible for the dispensing appended to the prescription record, and every
prescription record shall be preserved and legible for a period of not less
than five years. The prescription records shall be subject at all times to the
inspection of the director of health or the director's agent.

(b) Prescription records may be electronically
maintained using an appropriate prescription information processing system;
provided that:

(1) There are procedures to maintain the records,
including but not limited to auxiliary procedures for backing up files,
computer downtime, and the protection of patient confidentiality; and

(2) Upon request the prescription records, or a
subset thereof, shall be provided to the director or the director's agent, in a
form specified by the director, within forty-eight hours.

(c) Prescription records shall be maintained
electronically or manually such that the information is readily retrievable
during the pharmacy's normal operating hours. [L 1992, c 177, pt of §1; am L
1997, c 214, §5; am L 2000, c 83, §5; am L 2001, c 124, §5; am L 2003, c 56, §4;
am L 2013, c 250, §6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next